Tennessee, session 114, HB1915.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-1-103, is amended by designating
the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as subsection (b):
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a receivership proceeding initiated in this
state must not interfere with, and a judge or chancellor shall not limit, impede, or enjoin,
the rights of a holder of an interest in receivership property if the holder's interest is
superior, as defined in § 29-40-102, to that of the party initiating the receivership, absent
the express consent of the superior interest holder. A superior interest holder's actions
to establish or enforce a priority interest do not constitute consent to a receivership.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-40-102, is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
( ) "Superior" means an interest that has priority over other interests in the same
property under state law, including, but not limited to:
(A) The interest of the holder or beneficiary of a prior recorded deed of
trust, security instrument, or other instrument evidencing an interest in the same
property, is superior to the interest of a holder, beneficiary, or owner of a later
recorded deed of trust or other security instrument, or other instrument
evidencing an interest in the same property;
HB1915
010911
- 1 -

(B) The interest of the holder or beneficiary of a prior-filed Uniform
Commercial Code financing statement is superior to the interest of a later-filed
Uniform Commercial Code financing statement in the same property; and
(C) The interest of the holder or beneficiary of any recorded deed of trust,
financing statement, other security instrument, or other instrument evidencing an
interest in the same property, is superior to the interest in the same property of a
person, including the person's heirs, successors, and assigns, who made or
granted the deed of trust, financing statement, or other security instrument, or
against whom the instrument is asserted;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-40-105, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as subsection (b):
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), establishing exclusive jurisdiction does not
supersede or defeat any enforceable venue, jurisdiction, or choice of law agreement of
the party whose interest in the property subject to receivership is superior to that of the
party initiating the receivership.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-40-114(d), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(6) An act, action, or proceeding to enforce or exercise the rights of an interest
holder in property subject to a receivership that is superior to the interest of the party
initiating the receivership proceeding.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-40-114, is amended by adding
the following as new subsections:
(g) A judge or chancellor shall not issue an order that limits, impedes, or enjoins
the rights of an interest holder in property subject to a receivership that is superior to the
interest of the party initiating the receivership proceeding.
- 2 - 010911

(h) In the event a party elects to intervene in a receivership proceeding to obtain
a determination by the court of the priority of the superior interest in the property subject
to the receivership proceeding, the election does not constitute consent to the
receivership, and if the court determines that the interest of the intervening party is
superior to the interest of the party initiating the receivership, then:
(1) The court shall not issue an order or take action to limit, impede, or
enjoin the rights of an interest holder in property subject to a receivership that is
superior to the interest of the party initiating the receivership proceeding; and
(2) The court shall award the intervening party holding the superior
interest reasonable attorney's fees and costs incurred in seeking the
determination.
SECTION 6. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, then the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end, the provisions of
this act are severable.
SECTION 7. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to proceedings initiated on or after the effective date.
- 3 - 010911